Mississippi, session 2026, HB4167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jon E. Walker of Benton County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential in DeSoto County, on January 15, 1998, for which he was sentenced to serve sixty (60) months of supervised probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He violated probation and it was revoked.  On October 8, 1998, he was sentenced to serve five (5) years and thirty (30) days in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released on January 22, 2002, and returned on March 24, 2002, as a result of an Earned Release Supervision violation.  He was discharged January 7, 2004.    On February 8, 2006, in DeSoto County, he was sentenced to serve seven (7) years for the crime of Credit Card Fraud and Uttering Forgery in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released on September 7, 2007.  He was discharged on February 26, 2008.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.